District of Columbia statutes.
4-206.04

Family Emergency Services Program.

The Mayor, in administering the Family Emergency Services Program, may claim federal financial participation to the extent allowable by law for assistance and services to needy families with children, provided the family has not received assistance from any emergency program for more than 30 consecutive days within the last 12 months, and provided the emergency did not arise because the child, parent, or other relative refused without good cause to accept employment or training for employment.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 604, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-192, § 3(c), 43 DCR 4285
1981 Ed., § 3-206.4.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of Emergency Assistance Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-24, July 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 3830).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(c) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-36, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1839), § 3(c) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-105, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4019), § 3(c) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-425, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6141), § 3(c) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-485, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 630), and see § 3(c) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-42, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2091).